Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1057XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1057XD (2) 91
as/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 708.3A, subsections 1, 2, 3, and 4, Code
2025, are amended to read as follows:
1. A person who commits an assault, as defined in section
708.1, against a peace officer, jailer, correctional staff,
member or employee of the board of parole, health care
provider, employee of the department of health and human
services, employee of the department of revenue, national
guard member engaged in national guard duty or state active
duty, civilian employee of a law enforcement agency, civilian
employee of a fire department, or fire fighter, whether paid
or volunteer, with the knowledge that the person against
whom the assault is committed is a peace officer, jailer,
correctional staff, member or employee of the board of parole,
health care provider, employee of the department of health and
human services, employee of the department of revenue, national
guard member engaged in national guard duty or state active
duty, civilian employee of a law enforcement agency, civilian
employee of a fire department, or fire fighter and with the
intent to inflict a serious injury upon the peace officer,
jailer, correctional staff, member or employee of the board
of parole, health care provider, employee of the department
of health and human services, employee of the department of
revenue, national guard member engaged in national guard duty
or state active duty, civilian employee of a law enforcement
agency, civilian employee of a fire department, or fire
fighter, is guilty of a class “D” “C” felony.
2. A person who commits an assault, as defined in section
708.1, against a peace officer, jailer, correctional staff,
member or employee of the board of parole, health care
provider, employee of the department of health and human
services, employee of the department of revenue, national
guard member engaged in national guard duty or state active
duty, civilian employee of a law enforcement agency, civilian
employee of a fire department, or fire fighter, whether paid
or volunteer, who knows that the person against whom the
LSB 1057XD (2) 91
-1- as/js 1/5

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
assault is committed is a peace officer, jailer, correctional
staff, member or employee of the board of parole, health care
provider, employee of the department of health and human
services, employee of the department of revenue, national
guard member engaged in national guard duty or state active
duty, civilian employee of a law enforcement agency, civilian
employee of a fire department, or fire fighter and who uses or
displays a dangerous weapon in connection with the assault, is
guilty of a class “D” “C” felony.
3. A person who commits an assault, as defined in section
708.1, against a peace officer, jailer, correctional staff,
member or employee of the board of parole, health care
provider, employee of the department of health and human
services, employee of the department of revenue, national
guard member engaged in national guard duty or state active
duty, civilian employee of a law enforcement agency, civilian
employee of a fire department, or fire fighter, whether paid
or volunteer, who knows that the person against whom the
assault is committed is a peace officer, jailer, correctional
staff, member or employee of the board of parole, health care
provider, employee of the department of health and human
services, employee of the department of revenue, national
guard member engaged in national guard duty or state active
duty, civilian employee of a law enforcement agency, civilian
employee of a fire department, or fire fighter, and who causes
bodily injury or mental illness, is guilty of an aggravated
misdemeanor a class “D” felony.
4. Any other assault, as defined in section 708.1,
including an assault causing another to come into contact
with saliva by throwing, tossing, spitting, or expelling the
fluid, committed against a peace officer, jailer, correctional
staff, member or employee of the board of parole, health care
provider, employee of the department of health and human
services, employee of the department of revenue, national
guard member engaged in national guard duty or state active
LSB 1057XD (2) 91
-2- as/js 2/5

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
duty, civilian employee of a law enforcement agency, civilian
employee of a fire department, or fire fighter, whether paid
or volunteer, by a person who knows that the person against
whom the assault is committed is a peace officer, jailer,
correctional staff, member or employee of the board of parole,
health care provider, employee of the department of health and
human services, employee of the department of revenue, national
guard member engaged in national guard duty or state active
duty, civilian employee of a law enforcement agency, civilian
employee of a fire department, or fire fighter, is a serious
an aggravated misdemeanor. A person convicted of violating
this subsection shall serve a minimum term of seven days of
the sentence imposed by law, and shall not be eligible for
suspension of the minimum sentence.
Sec. 2. Section 708.3B, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
708.3B Inmate assaults —— bodily fluids or secretions.
A person who, while confined in a jail or in an institution
or facility under the control of the department of corrections,
commits any of the following acts commits a class “D” felony:
1. An assault, as defined under section 708.1, upon an
employee of the jail or institution or facility under the
control of the department of corrections, which that results
in the employee’s contact with blood, seminal fluid, urine,
saliva, or feces.
2. An act which that is intended to cause pain or injury
or be insulting or offensive and which that results in blood,
seminal fluid, urine, saliva, or feces being cast or expelled
upon an employee of the jail or institution or facility under
the control of the department of corrections.